src/fst/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON MAHTALADDAStem
! +Der3+Der/PassL+V+IV+Der4+Der/supmi+N+Sg+Ill+Use/-PLX:»Y7supmái K ; !not necessary here
 MAHTALADDAINCH ;
 SG3PASSV ;

LEXICON LAIGOHADDAStem
 :Y7j PASSIVE ;
! +Der3+Der/PassL+V+IV+Der4+Der/supmi+N+Sg+Ill+Use/-PLX:»Y7supmái K ; !not necessary here
 +Der1+Der/PassS+V+IV:»Y7  OT-PASSIVE ;
 LAIGOHADDAINCH ;


LEXICON DIEHTISHORTStem
 :Y7j PASSIVE ;
 +Der3+Der/PassL+V+IV+Der4+Der/supmi+N+Sg+Ill+Use/-PLX:»Y7supmái K ;
 +Der1+Der/PassS+V+IV:»Y7  OT-PASSIVE ;
 DIEHTISHORTINCH ;

LEXICON DIEHTILONGSHORTStem
 :Y7j PASSIVE ;
 +Der3+Der/PassL+V+IV+Der4+Der/supmi+N+Sg+Ill+Use/-PLX:»Y7supmái K ;
 +Der1+Der/PassS+V+IV:»Y7 OT-PASSIVE ;
 DIEHTILONGSHORTINCH ;

LEXICON BAHCCIStem
 :Y7j PASSIVE ;
 +Der3+Der/PassL+V+IV+Der4+Der/supmi+N+Sg+Ill+Use/-PLX:»Y7supmái K ;
 +Der1+Der/PassS+V+IV:»Y7 OT-PASSIVE ;
BAHCCIINCH ;

LEXICON BOAHTIStem
 SG3PASSV ;
 BOAHTIINCH ;

LEXICON AKTIStem
! SG3PASSV ;
 AKTIINCH ;


LEXICON BOAHTALADDAStem
 SG3PASSV ;
 BOAHTALADDAINCH ;

LEXICON BOAHTILONGSHORTStem
 SG3PASSV ;
 DIEHTILONGSHORTINCH ;

LEXICON DIEHTIINCH
 DeverbalNounsDIEHTI ;
 +Der4+Der/InchL+V:»goahºti%> GOAHTICnj " INCH" ;
 +Der4+Der/InchL+V+Err/Orth:»goahtti%> GOAHTICnj " INCH" ;
 BOAHTICnj ;

LEXICON DAHKAINCH
 DeverbalNounsDIEHTI ;
 +Der4+Der/InchL+V:»goahºti%> GOAHTICnj " INCH" ;
 +Der4+Der/InchL+V+Err/Orth:»goahtti%> GOAHTICnj " INCH" ;
 +Ind+Prs: PrsV ;
 +Ind+Prt: PrtV ;
 +Pot+Prs:Q7ž PotC ;
 +Cond: CondV1 ;
! +Imprt+Sg1:Q3n ENDLEX ;       ! bohton
 +Imprt+Sg3:Q3s 12pflag ;       ! bohtos
 +Imprt+Du2:Y1 12pflag ;        ! boahtti
 +Imprt+Du3:Q3ska 12pflag ;     ! bohtoska
 +Imprt+Pl1+Dial/-KJ:Q3t 12pflag ;       ! bohtot
 +Imprt+Pl1+Dial/-GG:Y2t 12pflag ;       ! boahttut
 +Imprt+Pl2+Use/NG+Dial/-GG:Y1t 12pflag ;       ! boahttit
 +Imprt+Pl2+Dial/-KJ:Q2t 12pflag ;       ! bohtet
 +Imprt+Pl2+Dial/-GG:Y3t 12pflag ;       ! boahttet
 +Imprt+Pl3:Q3set 12pflag ;     ! bohtoset
 +Imprt: ImprtV2 ;
 +Imprt:Q6 ImprtSg2 ; !Prs:Q6 ImprtSg2
 :X1 NominalFormsV1 ;
 :X4 NominalFormsV2 ;
 +Use/NG:Q6 NominalFormsV3 ;
 :X2 NominalFormsV4 ;
 +Use/-Spell:Q3 NominalFormsV5 ;
 +Use/-Spell:Y1 NominalFormsV6 ;
! check whether V7 and V8 should
! be deleted as V3 doublets
 :X6 NominalFormsV9 ; ! supine forms


LEXICON MUHTTIINCH
 +Ind+Prs: PrsV ;
 +Ind+Prt: PrtV ;
 +Pot+Prs:Q7ž PotC ;
 +Cond: CondV1 ;
 +Imprt: ImprtVA ;
! +Use/-Spell: DeverbalNounsDIEHTI ;
 +Der4+Der/InchL+V:»goahºti%> GOAHTICnj " INCH" ;
 +Der4+Der/InchL+V+Err/Orth:»goahtti%> GOAHTICnj " INCH" ;
 +Inf:X1t K ;
! +Actio+Nom:X1n K ;    muhttin
! +Actio+Gen+Use/NG:X1n K ; ! (Re?)introducing?   muhttin
 +Actio+Ess:X1me K ;
 +Actio+Ess+Use/NG:X1min K ;
 +Actio+Ess+Use/NG:X1men K ;
 +Actio+Loc:X1mis K ;
 +Actio+Com:X1mijn K ;
 :X4 NominalFormsV2 ;
 +Use/NG:Q6 NominalFormsV3 ;
 :X2 NominalFormsV4 ;
 +Use/-PLX:Q3 NominalFormsV5 ;
 +Use/-PLX:Y1 NominalFormsV6 ;
 :X6 NominalFormsV9 ; ! supine forms

LEXICON FAHTIINCH
! DeverbalNounsDIEHTI ;
 +Der4+Der/InchL+V:»goahºti%> GOAHTICnj " INCH" ;
 +Der4+Der/InchL+V+Err/Orth:»goahtti%> GOAHTICnj " INCH" ;
 +Ind+Prs: PrsV ;
 +Ind+Prt: PrtV ;
 +Pot+Prs:Q7ž PotC ;
 +Cond: CondV1 ;
 +Imprt+Sg1:Q3n 12pflag ;       ! bohton
 +Imprt+Sg3:Q3s 12pflag ;       ! bohtos
 +Imprt+Du2:Y1 12pflag ;        ! boahtti
 +Imprt+Du3:Q3ska 12pflag ;     ! bohtoska
 +Imprt+Pl1+Dial/-KJ:Q3t 12pflag ;       ! bohtot
 +Imprt+Pl1+Dial/-GG:Y2t 12pflag ;       ! boahttut
 +Imprt+Pl2+Use/NG+Dial/-GG:Y1t 12pflag ;       ! boahttit
 +Imprt+Pl2+Dial/-KJ:Q2t 12pflag ;       ! bohtet
! +Imprt+Pl2+Dial/-GG:Y3t ENDLEX ;       ! Fáhttet
 +Imprt+Pl3:Q3set 12pflag ;     ! bohtoset
 +Imprt: ImprtV2 ;
 :Q6 ImprtSg2 ; !Prs:Q6 ImprtSg2
 :X1 NominalFormsV1 ;
 :X4 NominalFormsV2 ;
 +Use/NG:Q6 NominalFormsV3 ;
 :X2 NominalFormsV4 ;
 +Use/-Spell:Q3 NominalFormsV5 ;
 +Use/-Spell:Y1 NominalFormsV6 ;
! check whether V7 and V8 should
! be deleted as V3 doublets
 :X6 NominalFormsV9 ; ! supine forms



LEXICON BOAHTIINCH
 DeverbalNounsBOAHTI ;
 +Der4+Der/InchL+V:»goahºti%> GOAHTICnj " INCH" ;
 +Der4+Der/InchL+V+Err/Orth:»goahtti%> GOAHTICnj " INCH" ;
 BOAHTICnj ;

LEXICON AKTIINCH
 DeverbalNounsBOAHTI ;
 +Der4+Der/InchL+V:»goahºti%> GOAHTICnj " INCH" ;
 +Der4+Der/InchL+V+Err/Orth:»goahtti%> GOAHTICnj " INCH" ;
! BOAHTICnj ;
 +Ind+Prs: PrsV ;
 +Ind+Prt: PrtV ;
 +Pot+Prs:Q7ž PotC ;
 +Cond: CondV1 ;
 +Imprt: ImprtVA ;
 :X1 NominalFormsV1 ;
 :X4 NominalFormsV2 ;
 +Use/NG:Q6 NominalFormsV3 ;
 :X2 NominalFormsV4 ;
! +Use/-Spell:Q3 NominalFormsV5 ;
 +Use/-Spell:Y1 NominalFormsV6 ;
! check whether V7 and V8 should
! be deleted as V3 doublets
 :X6 NominalFormsV9 ; ! supine forms


LEXICON RAIMMAHALLAINCH
 DeverbalNounsRAIMMAHALLA ;
 +Der4+Der/InchL+V:»goahºti%> GOAHTICnj " INCH" ;
 +Der4+Der/InchL+V+Err/Orth:»goahtti%> GOAHTICnj " INCH" ;
 RAIMMAHALLACnj ;




LEXICON BOAHTALADDAINCH
 DeverbalNounsBOAHTALADDA ;
 +Der4+Der/InchL+V:»goahºti%> GOAHTICnj " INCH" ;
 +Der4+Der/InchL+V+Err/Orth:»goahtti%> GOAHTICnj " INCH" ;
 BOAHTICnj ;

LEXICON DIEHTALADDAINCH
 DeverbalNounsDIEHTALADDA ;
 +Der4+Der/InchL+V:»goahºti%> GOAHTICnj " INCH" ;
 +Der4+Der/InchL+V+Err/Orth:»goahtti%> GOAHTICnj " INCH" ;
 BOAHTICnj ;

LEXICON MAHTALADDAINCH
 +Der4+Der/InchL+V:»goahºti%> GOAHTICnj " INCH" ;
 +Der4+Der/InchL+V+Err/Orth:»goahtti%> GOAHTICnj " INCH" ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Ess+Use/NG:»min K ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Ess:»me K ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Ess+Use/NG:»men K ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Cmp/SgNom:»n R ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Nom:»n K ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Gen+Use/NG:»n K ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Gen:»ma K ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Acc:»ma K ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Cmp/SgGen:»ma R ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Ill:»mij K ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Loc:»mis K ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Com:»mijn K ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Com+Err/Orth:»mijnna K ;
BOAHTICnj ;


LEXICON LAIGOHADDAINCH
! +Use/-Spell: DeverbalNounsDIEHTALADDA ;
 +Der4+Der/InchL+V:»goahºti%> GOAHTICnj " INCH" ;
 +Der4+Der/InchL+V+Err/Orth:»goahtti%> GOAHTICnj " INCH" ;
 +Ind+Prs: PrsV ;
 +Ind+Prt: PrtV ;
 +Pot+Prs:Q7ž PotC ;
 +Cond: CondV1 ;
 +Imprt+Sg1:Q3n 12pflag ;       ! bohton
 +Imprt+Sg3:Q3s 12pflag ;       ! bohtos
 +Imprt+Du2:Y1 12pflag ;        ! boahtti
 +Imprt+Du3:Q3ska 12pflag ;     ! bohtoska
 +Imprt+Pl1+Dial/-KJ:Q3t 12pflag ;       ! bohtot
 +Imprt+Pl1+Dial/-GG:Y2t 12pflag ;       ! boahttut
! +Imprt+Pl2+Use/NG+Dial/-GG:Y1t ENDLEX ;       ! láigohaddit
 +Imprt+Pl2+Dial/-KJ:Q2t 12pflag ;       ! bohtet
 +Imprt+Pl2+Dial/-GG:Y3t 12pflag ;       ! boahttet
 +Imprt+Pl3:Q3set 12pflag ;     ! bohtoset
 +Imprt: ImprtV2 ;
 +Imprt:Q6 ImprtSg2 ; !Prs:Q6 ImprtSg2
 :X1 NominalFormsV1 ;
 :X4 NominalFormsV2 ;
 +Use/NG:Q6 NominalFormsV3 ;
 :X2 NominalFormsV4 ;
 +Use/-Spell:Q3 NominalFormsV5 ;
 :Y1 NominalFormsV6 ;
! check whether V7 and V8 should
! be deleted as V3 doublets
 :X6 NominalFormsV9 ; ! supine forms


LEXICON DIEHTISHORTINCH
DeverbalNounsDIEHTISHORT ;
 +Der4+Der/InchL+V:»goahºti%> GOAHTICnj ;
 +Der4+Der/InchL+V+Err/Orth:»goahtti%> GOAHTICnj " INCH" ;
 BOAHTICnj ;

LEXICON DIEHTILONGSHORTINCH
DeverbalNounsDIEHTILONGSHORT ;
 +Der4+Der/InchL+V:»goahºti%> GOAHTICnj ;
 +Der4+Der/InchL+V+Err/Orth:»goahtti%> GOAHTICnj " INCH" ;
 BOAHTICnj ;

LEXICON BAHCCIINCH
DeverbalNounsBAHCCI ;
 +Der4+Der/InchL+V:»goahºti%> GOAHTICnj ;
 +Der4+Der/InchL+V+Err/Orth:»goahtti%> GOAHTICnj " INCH" ;
 BOAHTICnj ;


LEXICON AT_IV_CGforms
 +V+IV: AT_CGforms ;

LEXICON AT_TV_CGforms
 +V+TV: AT_CGforms ;


LEXICON AT_CGforms
 +Ind+Prs: PrsV1 ;
 +Ind+Prt: PrtV1 ;
 +Ind+Prs+ConNeg: K ;


LEXICON BOAHTICnj
 +Ind+Prs: PrsV ;
 +Ind+Prt: PrtV ;
 +Pot+Prs:Q7ž PotC ;
 +Cond: CondV1 ;
 +Imprt: ImprtVA ;
 :X1 NominalFormsV1 ;
 :X4 NominalFormsV2 ;
 +Use/NG:Q6 NominalFormsV3 ;
 :X2 NominalFormsV4 ;
 +Use/-Spell:Q3 NominalFormsV5 ;
 :Y1 NominalFormsV6 ;
! check whether V7 and V8 should
! be deleted as V3 doublets
 :X6 NominalFormsV9 ; ! supine forms
