src/fst/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON Humsubj-VerbRoot   !!= * **@CODE@**
duostat+Err/Orth:duosta AT_TV_CGforms ;
dutkat+Err/Orth:dutka AT_TV_CGforms ;
